src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-u-verbs_gt-norm.yaml
#Past participle, dual object
    тотуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScSg1+OcDu: тотмагум
    тотуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScSg2+OcDu: тотмагын
    тотуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScSg3+OcDu: тотмаге
    тотуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScDu1+OcDu: [тотмагаме̄н, тотмагагме̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScDu2+OcDu: [тотмагы̄н, тотмагагы̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScDu3+OcDu: [тотмагы̄н, тотмагагы̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScPl1+OcDu: тотмагув
    тотуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScPl2+OcDu: [тотмагы̄н, тотмагагы̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScPl3+OcDu: [тотмаганыл, тотмагаганыл]

#Past participle, plural object
    тотуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScSg1+OcPl: [тотманум, тотмананум]
    тотуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScSg2+OcPl: [тотман, тотма̄нын]
    тотуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScSg3+OcPl: [тотма̄нэ, тотмана̄нэ]
    тотуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScDu1+OcPl: [тотманаме̄н, тотмананме̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScDu2+OcPl: [тотманн, тотманы̄н, тотмананы̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScDu3+OcPl: [тотманэ̄н, тотмананэ̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScPl1+OcPl: [тотманув, тотмананув]
    тотуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScPl2+OcPl: [тотманы̄н, тотмананы̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+PrfPrc+ScPl3+OcPl: [тотма̄ныл, тотмана̄ныл]

#Gerund
    тотуӈкве+V+Ger: тотым
    тотуӈкве+V+Ger+PxSg1: тотымам
    тотуӈкве+V+Ger+PxSg2: тотыман
    тотуӈкве+V+Ger+PxSg3: тотыма
    тотуӈкве+V+Ger+PxDu1: тотымаме̄н
    тотуӈкве+V+Ger+PxDu2: [тотыман, тотыма̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+Ger+PxDu3: тотнсыма̄г
    тотуӈкве+V+Ger+PxPl1: тотымав
    тотуӈкве+V+Ger+PxPl2: [тотыман, тотыма̄н]
    тотуӈкве+V+Ger+PxPl3: тотымат

#Privative
    тотуӈкве+V+Ger: тоттал
